dev/mt_wiktionary/nounNoNumber.all.fat.dix
  <!-- iben; iben; 1 -->
    <pardef n="iben__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Randan; Randan; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Randan__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kalendarju; kalendarju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kalendarju__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kalendarju; kalendarju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="kalendarju__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mnieħer; mnieħer; 1 -->
    <pardef n="mnieħer__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- perżuta; perżuta; 1 -->
    <pardef n="perżuta__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qalb; qalb; 1 -->
    <pardef n="qalb__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- qarnita; qarnita; 1 -->
    <pardef n="qarnita__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lvant; lvant; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lvant__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- lvant; lvant; 1 -->
    <pardef n="lvant__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- toqba_sewda; toqba_sewda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="toqba_sewda__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- driegħ; driegħ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="driegħ__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- driegħ; driegħ; 1 -->
    <pardef n="driegħ__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Feniċju; Feniċju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Feniċju__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- Feniċju; Feniċju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="Feniċju__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- avanzatt; avanzatt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="avanzatt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- avanzatt; avanzatt; 1 -->
    <pardef n="avanzatt__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- niġma; niġma; 1 -->
    <pardef n="niġma__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- niġma; niġma; 1 -->
    <pardef n="niġma__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ambaxxata; ambaxxata; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ambaxxata__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ġenitali; ġenitali; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ġenitali__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċentinarju; ċentinarju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċentinarju__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċentinarju; ċentinarju; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ċentinarju__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għerf; għerf; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għerf__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għerf; għerf; 1 -->
    <pardef n="għerf__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- reġina_tan-naħal; reġina_tan-naħal; 1 -->
    <pardef n="reġina_tan-naħal__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- pjaneta; pjaneta; 1 -->
    <pardef n="pjaneta__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bużżieqa_tal-awrina; bużżieqa_tal-awrina; 1 -->
    <pardef n="bużżieqa_tal-awrina__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- riħ_solari; riħ_solari; 1 -->
    <pardef n="riħ_solari__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- formazzjoni; formazzjoni; 1 -->
    <pardef n="formazzjoni__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- buzza; buzza; 1 -->
    <pardef n="buzza__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- warda; warda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="warda__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- warda; warda; 1 -->
    <pardef n="warda__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="ND"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="iben"><i>iben</i><par n="iben__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Randan"><i>Randan</i><par n="Randan__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kalendarju"><i>kalendarju</i><par n="kalendarju__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kalendarju"><i>kalendarju</i><par n="kalendarju__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="mnieħer"><i>mnieħer</i><par n="mnieħer__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="perżuta"><i>perżuta</i><par n="perżuta__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="qalb"><i>qalb</i><par n="qalb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qarnita"><i>qarnita</i><par n="qarnita__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lvant"><i>lvant</i><par n="lvant__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lvant"><i>lvant</i><par n="lvant__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="toqba_sewda"><i>toqba_sewda</i><par n="toqba_sewda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="driegħ"><i>driegħ</i><par n="driegħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="driegħ"><i>driegħ</i><par n="driegħ__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Feniċju"><i>Feniċju</i><par n="Feniċju__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="Feniċju"><i>Feniċju</i><par n="Feniċju__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="avanzatt"><i>avanzatt</i><par n="avanzatt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="avanzatt"><i>avanzatt</i><par n="avanzatt__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="niġma"><i>niġma</i><par n="niġma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="niġma"><i>niġma</i><par n="niġma__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ambaxxata"><i>ambaxxata</i><par n="ambaxxata__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenitali"><i>ġenitali</i><par n="ġenitali__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="ċentinarju"><i>ċentinarju</i><par n="ċentinarju__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċentinarju"><i>ċentinarju</i><par n="ċentinarju__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="għerf"><i>għerf</i><par n="għerf__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għerf"><i>għerf</i><par n="għerf__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="reġina_tan-naħal"><i>reġina_tan-naħal</i><par n="reġina_tan-naħal__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pjaneta"><i>pjaneta</i><par n="pjaneta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bużżieqa_tal-awrina"><i>bużżieqa_tal-awrina</i><par n="bużżieqa_tal-awrina__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="riħ_solari"><i>riħ_solari</i><par n="riħ_solari__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="formazzjoni"><i>formazzjoni</i><par n="formazzjoni__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="buzza"><i>buzza</i><par n="buzza__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="warda"><i>warda</i><par n="warda__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="warda"><i>warda</i><par n="warda__n_GD"/></e>
